it: Commercio e industria > Movimentazione di materiali > Elevatori e paranchi > Paranchi, gru e carrelli: Paranchi a catena; Gru a portale; Gru a bandiera; Carrelli; Paranchi a fune metallica
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Materiaalien käsittely > Hissit ja nostimet > Nostimet, kurjet ja vaunut: Ketjunostimet; Pukkinosturit; Puominosturit; Kärryt; Vaijerinostimet
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การขนถ่ายวัสดุ > ลิฟท์และเครื่องยก > เครื่องยก เครน และรถเข็น: รอกโซ่; เครนขาสูง; เครนเสายื่นแขนหมุน; รถเข็นขนของ; รอกสลิง
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Anyagkezelés > Felvonók és emelők > Emelők, daruk és kocsik: Láncos emelők; Portáldaruk; Gömbdaruk; Kocsik; Drótköteles emelők
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Manipularea materialelor > Ascensoare și elevatoare > Elevatoare, macarale și cărucioare: Elevatoare cu lanț; Macarale tip portal; Macarale pivotante; Cărucioare; Elevatoare cu cablu
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medžiagų tvarkymas > Keltuvai ir gervės > Gervės, kranai ir vežimėliai: Grandininės gervės; Ožiniai kranai; Gembiniai kranai; Vežimėliai; Trosinės gervės
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Погрузо-разгрузочные операции > Подъемные механизмы > Тали, краны и тележки: Цепные тали; Козловые краны; Консольные краны; Тележки; Канатные тали
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Χειρισμός υλικών > Ανελκυστήρες & ανυψωτικά > Ανυψωτήρες, γερανοί & καρότσια: Ανυψωτήρες με αλυσίδας; Γερανογέφυρες; Περιστροφικοί γερανοί (Jib Cranes); Καρότσια/τρόλεϊ; Ανυψωτήρες με συρματόσχοινο
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Manipulácia s materiálom > Výťahy a kladkostroje > Kladkostroje, žeriavy a vozíky: Reťazové kladkostroje; Portálové žeriavy; Otočné žeriavy; Vozíky; Lanové kladkostroje
sv: Företag och industri > Materialhantering > Lyftanordningar > Hissverk, lyftkranar och kranvagnar: Kättingtelfer; Gantry-kranar; Fockkranar; Kranvagnar; Vajertelfer
es: Economía e industria > Manipulación de materiales > Izado y subida > Montacargas, grúas y trolleys: Montacargas de cadena; Grúas pórtico; Grúas giratorias; Carros; Montacargas de cable
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Materiaalbehandeling > Takelen en heffen > Takels, kranen en steekwagens: Kettingtakels; Portaalkranen; Zwenkkranen; Steekwagens; Staalkabeltakels
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Vận chuyển vật tư > Vận thăng & Cần trục > Dây tời, cần cẩu và xe đẩy: Dây tời xích; Cần cẩu giàn; Cần cẩu ống lồng; Xe đẩy tay; Cáp nâng
nb: Forretninger og industri > Materialhåndtering > Heiser og løftere > Løftere, kraner og vogner: Kjedetaljer; Gantrykraner; Jibkraner; Traller; Vaierløftere
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 運搬 > リフト・ホイスト > クレーン・台車: チェーンブロック; ガントリークレーン; ジブクレーン; トロリー; ワイヤーロープホイスト
da: Erhverv og industri > Materialehåndtering > Hejseværk > Hejseværk, kraner og løbekatte: Kædetaljer; Gantry-kraner; Jib-kraner; Løbekatte; Ståltovstaler
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Товаро-разтоварни операции > Асансьори и подемници > Хаспели, кранове и колички: Верижни хаспели; Мостови кранове; Стрелкови кранове; Колички; Въжени хаспели
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Manipulace s materiálem > Zvedací zařízení > Kladkostroje, jeřáby a vozíky: Řetězové kladkostroje; Portálové jeřáby; Výložníkové jeřáby; Vozíky; Lanové kladkostroje
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Manuseio de materiais > Içamento > Elevadores, guindastes e troles: Talhas de corrente; Guindastes de pórtico; Guindastes de lança; Carrinho; Talhas de cabo de aço
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Rukovanje materijalom > Dizala i dizalice > Dizalice i kranovi: Lančane dizalice; Portalni kranovi; Nosači; Kolica za guranje; Dizalice sa žičanom užadi
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Transport materiałów > Narzędzia do wciągania i podnoszenia > Podnośniki, dźwigi i wózki: Wciągniki łańcuchowe; Suwnice; Żurawie wysięgnikowe; Wózki do przewożenia; Wciągniki linowe
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 자재 관리 > 리프트/호이스트 > 호이스트/크레인/트롤리: 체인 호이스트; 갠트리 크레인; 지브 크레인; 트롤리; 와이어 로프 호이스트
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Manuseamento de material > Elevadores e guindastes > Guindastes, gruas e tróleis: Talhas de corrente; Guindastes de pórtico; Guindastes; Carrinhos; Guindastes de cabo de aço
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 材料处理 > 起重设备 > 提升机、起重机与手推车: 链式起重机; 桥式起重机; 悬臂起重机; 触轮杆; 钢索升降机
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Manipuliranje z materialom > Dvigala in dvižne naprave > Dvigala, žerjavi in vozički: Verižna dvigala; Mostna dvigala; Teleskopski žerjavi; Vozički; Dvigala z žično vrvjo
en: Business & Industrial > Material Handling > Lifts & Hoists > Hoists, Cranes & Trolleys: Chain Hoists; Gantry Cranes; Jib Cranes; Trolleys; Wire Rope Hoists
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 物料處理 > 升降機和吊機 > 起重機/吊車: 鏈條吊車; 龍門起重機; 旋臂起重機; 運送手推車; 鋼索吊車
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Manipulation de matériel > Ascenseurs et monte-charge > Monte-charge, grues et chariots: Monte-charges à chaîne; Portiques; Grues à flèche; Chariots; Monte-charges à câble
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Materialbeförderung > Aufzüge & Hebeeinrichtungen > Hebezüge, Kräne & Laufkatzen: Kettenzüge; Portalkrane; Auslegerkrane; Trolleys; Drahtseilzüge
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Malzeme Taşıma > Asansörler ve Kaldıraçlar > Kaldıraçlar, Vinçler ve Yük Arabaları: Zincirli Kaldıraçlar; Portal Vinçler; Pergel Vinçler; Yük Arabaları; Halatlı Vinçler